District of Columbia statutes.
2-327.02

Expired

Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department small purchase authority.

Expired.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1602, 45 DCR 7193
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.22.
For temporary amendment of D.C. Act 12-401 by adding a new § 1204, see § 4 of Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-480, October 28, 1999, 45 DCR 8016).
For temporary amendment of D.C. Law 12-175 by adding a new § 1604, see § 5 of Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-480, October 28, 1999, 45 DCR 8016); and § 5 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-4, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2291).
For temporary addition of section, see § 1202 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794) and § 1202 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, 46 DCR 669).
Section 1204 of D.C. Act 12-564 provided this title shall expire on September 30, 1999.
Section 2101 of D.C. Act 12-564 provided for the application of the act.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1202 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department Small Purchase Authority Act: Section 1601 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that this title may be cited as the “Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department Small Purchase Authority Act of 1998.”